Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 9

Commission on Responsible Fatherhood [Obsolete]

3-15-901 — 3-15-909. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§3-15-901 —3-15-909, (Acts 2000, ch. 974, §§ 2-10) concerning the commission on responsible fatherhood, was deleted in 2003 as obsolete pursuant to the June 30, 2002, termination of the affairs of the commission as stated in §§4-29-112 and4-29-223.